Connecticut, session 2026, SB00251.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 2-90 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
October 1, 2026):
(a) The Auditors of Public Accounts shall organize the work of their
office in such manner as they deem most economical and efficient and,
except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, shall determine the
scope and frequency of any audit they conduct.
(b) Said auditors, with the Comptroller, shall, at least annually and as
frequently as they deem necessary, audit the books and accounts of the
Treasurer, including, but not limited to, trust funds, as defined in section
3-13c, and certify the results to the Governor. The auditors shall, at least
annually and as frequently as they deem necessary, audit the books and
accounts of the Comptroller and certify the results to the Governor.
They shall examine and prepare certificates of audit with respect to the
financial statements contained in the annual reports of the Treasurer
and Comptroller, which certificates shall be made part of such annual
LCO 1 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 251
reports. In carrying out their responsibilities under this section, said
auditors may retain independent auditors to assist them.
(c) (1) Said auditors shall audit, on a biennial basis if deemed most
economical and efficient, or as frequently as they deem necessary, the
books and accounts, records of operations and activities, systems and
data of each officer, department, commission, board and court of the
state government, all institutions supported by the state and all public
and quasi-public bodies, politic and corporate, created by public or
special act of the General Assembly and not required to be audited or
subject to reporting requirements, under the provisions of chapter 111,
except as provided in subsection (d) of this section.
(2) Each such audit may include an examination of any relevant
information concerning the department, commission, board or court of
state government being audited that is in the possession or control of a
private entity that has a contract with such department, commission,
board or court, and such information shall be provided upon demand
in a format prescribed by the auditors at no cost to the auditors or the
department, commission, board or court.
(3) For each such audit of a private entity that receives two hundred
fifty thousand dollars or more in state funds annually to provide
housing or human services, the auditors shall visit the principal office
of such entity as part of the audit, unless such entity is subject to a single
audit or a program-specific audit pursuant to section 4-231.
[(3)] (4) Each such audit may include an examination of performance
in order to determine effectiveness in achieving expressed legislative
purposes. The joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to government oversight may request the
auditors to perform a limited performance engagement. Not later than
sixty days after receipt of such request, the auditors shall respond
regarding whether they will perform such limited performance
engagement and, if so, the suggested scope and schedule for such
engagement. The auditors shall perform any such limited performance
LCO 2 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 251
engagement within available appropriations. As used in this
subdivision, a "limited performance engagement" means a review of a
specific program or entity pursuant to an agreement between the
chairpersons and ranking members of the joint standing committee of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to
government oversight and the auditors concerning the objectives, scope,
methodology and timing of such engagement.
[(4)] (5) The auditors shall report their findings and recommendations
to the Governor, the State Comptroller and the joint standing
committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to appropriations and the budgets of state agencies and
government oversight.
(d) Not later than July 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, the auditors
shall submit a proposed schedule for the audits they plan to conduct
during the following fiscal year to the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to government
oversight.
(e) The Auditors of Public Accounts may enter into such contractual
agreements as may be necessary for the discharge of their duties. Any
audit or report which is prepared by a person, firm or corporation
pursuant to any contract with the Auditors of Public Accounts shall bear
the signature of the person primarily responsible for the preparation of
such audit or report. As used in this subsection, the term "person" means
a natural person.
(f) (1) If the Auditors of Public Accounts discover, or if it should come
to their knowledge, that any unauthorized, illegal, irregular or unsafe
handling or expenditure of state funds or quasi-public agency funds or
any breakdown in the safekeeping of any resources of the state or a
quasi-public agency has occurred or is contemplated, they shall
forthwith report the facts to the Governor, the State Comptroller, the
clerk of each house of the General Assembly, the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
LCO 3 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 251
relating to government oversight and the Attorney General, except that
if a matter reported to the Auditors of Public Accounts pursuant to
section 4-33a is still under investigation by a state or quasi-public
agency, the Auditors of Public Accounts may give the agency a
reasonable amount of time to conduct such investigation prior to the
auditors reporting the matter to said officials and committee.
(2) If the Auditors of Public Accounts decide to delay reporting such
matter in accordance with subdivision (1) of this subsection, the auditors
shall immediately notify the Attorney General of such decision.
(3) Any Auditor of Public Accounts neglecting to make the report
required under subdivision (1) of this subsection, or any agent of the
auditors neglecting to report to the Auditors of Public Accounts any
such matter discovered by such agent or coming to such agent's
knowledge, shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars or
imprisoned not more than six months, or both.
(4) Any state agency or quasi-public agency that is the subject of a
report of the Auditors of Public Accounts that contains violations of
state statute or regulation, other than only minor or technical
recommendations, not later than six months after the issuance of the
100 auditors' report, shall report on the status of any corrective action
101 undertaken by such state agency or quasi-public agency to address such
102 violations, to the auditors, the Governor and the General Assembly, in
103 accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a. Upon the receipt of the
104 agency's report, the joint standing committee of the General Assembly
105 having cognizance of matters relating to government oversight may
106 request the auditors to verify any matter in the agency's corrective
107 action report and the auditors shall have not more than sixty days to
108 respond to such request.
109 (5) The auditors may establish performance and accountability
110 standards for any state agency or quasi-public agency that is the subject
111 of a report of the Auditors of Public Accounts that contains substantial
112 violations of state statute or regulation concerning one or more
LCO 4 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 251
113 contracts. The auditors may require the state agency or quasi-public
114 agency to meet such standards, to the satisfaction of the auditors, prior
115 to the agency or quasi-public agency renewing such contracts.
116 (g) All reports issued or made pursuant to this section shall be
117 retained in the offices of the Auditors of Public Accounts for a period of
118 not less than five years. The auditors shall file one copy of each such
119 report with the State Librarian.
120 (h) Each state agency shall keep its accounts in such form and by such
121 methods as to exhibit the facts required by said auditors and, the
122 provisions of any other general statute notwithstanding, shall make all
123 records and accounts available to them or their agents, upon demand.
124 Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, no state agency
125 may deny the auditors access to their records or accounts.
126 (i) Where there are statutory requirements of confidentiality with
127 regard to such records and accounts or examinations of
128 nongovernmental entities which are maintained by a state agency, such
129 requirements of confidentiality and the penalties for the violation
130 thereof shall apply to the auditors and to their authorized
131 representatives in the same manner and to the same extent as such
132 requirements of confidentiality and penalties apply to such state agency.
133 In addition, the portion of (1) any audit or report prepared by the
134 Auditors of Public Accounts that concerns the internal control structure
135 of a state information system or the identity of an employee who
136 provides information regarding alleged fraud or weaknesses in the
137 control structure of a state agency that may lead to fraud, or (2) any
138 document that may reveal the identity of such employee, shall not be
139 subject to disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act, as defined
140 in section 1-200.
141 (j) Said auditors shall audit, in accordance with the provisions of
142 section 10-91g, the records and accounts of any private provider of
143 special education services, as defined in said section. Any private
144 provider of special education services being audited by said auditors
LCO 5 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 251
145 shall provide any information said auditors deem necessary to conduct
146 such audit.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 2-90
GOS Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 6 of 6